Maryland, session 2025, SB0916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–111.
(a) Subject to the applicable provisions of this article and the bylaws, basic
policies, and guidelines established by the State Board, each county board, on the written
recommendation of the county superintendent, shall:
(1) Establish curriculum guides and courses of study ALIGNED WITH THE
CONTENT STANDARDS, CURRICULUM STANDARDS, AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES
DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE for the schools under its jurisdiction,
including appropriate programs of instruction or training for mentally or physically
handicapped children; and
(2) Supply printed copies of these materials to any teacher or interested
[citizen] INDIVIDUAL.
7–202.1.

SENATE BILL 916 3
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTENT STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATEMENTS FOR THE
PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION THAT DESCRIBE THE KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS
STUDENTS ARE EXPECTED TO ATTAIN FOR EACH SUBJECT AND GRADE LEVEL.
(3) “CURRICULUM RESOURCES” MEANS GUIDANCE DOCUMENTS AND
FRAMEWORKS USED BY A COUNTY BOARD TO DEVELOP CURRICULA TO IMPLEMENT
CONTENT STANDARDS.
(4) “CURRICULUM STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATEMENTS THAT
OUTLINE APPROACHES TO LEARNING FOR EACH SUBJECT ACROSS GRADE LEVELS.
(B) (1) The Department shall, in consultation with experienced and highly
effective teachers, including teachers on the career ladder under Title 6, Subtitle 10 of this
article, develop CONTENT STANDARDS, curriculum standards, and curriculum resources
for each subject at each grade level, that build on one another in logical sequence, in core
subjects that may be used by local school systems and public school teachers.
(2) THE CONTENT STANDARDS, CURRICULUM STANDARDS, AND
CURRICULUM RESOURCES DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE EVIDENCE–BASED PRACTICES AND THE SCIENCE
OF INSTRUCTION TO ENSURE THAT ALL STUDENTS MEET THEIR FULL POTENTIAL;
(II) CONSIDER THE IMPACT ON ALL STUDENTS WITH A
STRATEGIC FOCUS ON MARGINALIZED STUDENT GROUPS; AND
(III) REFLECT THE HISTORY OF MARGINALIZED GROUPS WITH
PARTICULAR CONSIDERATION OF THE ASSOCIATED HISTORICAL CONTEXT AND
ROOT CAUSES OF MARGINALIZATION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE CONTENT STANDARDS,
CURRICULUM STANDARDS, AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES AT LEAST EVERY 8
YEARS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR
MAINTAINING STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT DURING THE PROCESSES OF
DEVELOPING AND REVIEWING CONTENT STANDARDS, CURRICULUM STANDARDS,
AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES.

SENATE BILL 916
(5) IF A COUNTY BOARD FAILS TO ESTABLISH CURRICULA AND
COURSES OF STUDY ALIGNED WITH THE CONTENT STANDARDS, CURRICULUM
STANDARDS, AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT MAY WITHHOLD STATE FUNDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 2–303 AND 5–205 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(b)] (C) (1) The purpose of the CONTENT STANDARDS, curriculum
standards, and curriculum resources developed under this section is to provide county
boards with technical assistance to inform high–quality instruction that will ultimately
result in students meeting the college and career readiness standards in the manner
described under § 7–205.1 of this subtitle.
(2) The curriculum resources developed under this section shall include,
for each core subject at each grade level:
(i) Course syllabi;
(ii) Sample lessons for teachers to use as models;
(iii) Examples of student work that meet standards for proficiency;
(iv) Explanations of why student work examples meet proficiency
standards so that teachers know what student knowledge is required; and
(v) Curriculum units aligned with the course syllabi.
(3) In developing the curriculum resources under this subsection, the
Department:
(i) May use as a model a course or unit developed by a teacher in or
out of the State; but
(ii) Shall review each model course and unit for quality, using
accepted benchmarks such as approval by EdReports or Tier 1 and Tier 2 evidence–based
standards established by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act.
(4) The Department shall compile curriculum units in such a manner that:
(i) Complete courses are formed; and
(ii) When taken by a student in sequence, the student can achieve
the college and career readiness standard adopted under § 7–205.1 of this subtitle by the
end of grade 10.

SENATE BILL 916 5
[(c)] (D) The Department shall submit CONTENT STANDARDS, CURRICULUM
STANDARDS, AND curriculum resources [and curriculum standards] developed under this
section to the State Board for adoption.
[(d)] (E) The State Board shall establish a system of assessments to ensure that
students are acquiring the knowledge contained in the CONTENT STANDARDS AND
curriculum standards in English, Mathematics, Science, and History or Social Studies.
[(e)] (F) (1) Using the assessments established under subsection [(d)] (E) of
this section, the Department shall identify low–performing schools.
(2) An Expert Review Team established under § 5–411 of this article, under
the supervision of the Department, shall visit schools identified under paragraph (1) of this
subsection according to the criteria established under § 5–411 of this article.
(3) If the Department, based on a recommendation of an Expert Review
Team, determines that a school’s low performance on assessments is, largely, due to
curricular problems, the school shall adopt the curriculum resources developed under this
section.
(4) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, this section does
not require a public school or county board to adopt the Department’s CONTENT
STANDARDS, curriculum standards, and curriculum resources and may not be construed
to restrict a county board’s authority to adopt curricula under § 4–111 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall:
(1) (i) review, revise, and adopt the curriculum standards for the State
comprehensive instructional program in social studies to include comprehensive antihate
education using associated historical contexts that have led to racism and prejudice in
society; and
(ii) develop and adopt interdisciplinary curriculum resources to
promote antihate education using associated historical contexts that have led to racism and
prejudice in society;
(2) (i) develop or revise and adopt content standards for high school
history to include instruction on:
1. the history and contributions of historically disadvantaged
groups;
2. the topics of genocide, torture, war crimes, crimes against
humanity, and the treatment of ethnic and religious minorities; and

SENATE BILL 916
3. the transatlantic slave trade;
(ii) revise and enhance the high school history frameworks to
incorporate the content standards adopted in accordance with item (i) of this item; and
(iii) review, revise, and adopt curriculum standards to incorporate
the history of genocide, including the Holocaust; and
(3) (i) 1. adopt content standards for elementary school social
studies for grades 4 and 5 to include instruction on the Holocaust within the grade 5 unit;
2. adopt content standards for middle school social studies to
include a study of the roots of antisemitism that led to the Holocaust so that students may
contextualize the study of the Holocaust in high school; and
3. adopt content standards for high school Modern World
History and United States History to include instruction on the Holocaust by first
understanding the origins of the Holocaust and to evaluate the causes, course, and
consequences of the Holocaust; and
(ii) review and enhance the elementary school and middle school
frameworks and the high school history frameworks to incorporate the content standards
regarding the Holocaust adopted in accordance with item (i) of this item.
(b) (1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, beginning in the
2026–2027 school year, all county boards of education in the State and all nonpublic schools
in the State that hold a Certificate of Approval issued by the State Board of Education
under § 2–206 of the Education Article establish curriculum resources for the schools under
their jurisdiction aligned with the content standards and curriculum standards adopted by
the State Board under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A nonpublic school that is operated by a registered bona fide church
organization or that has not been approved by the State Board under § 2–206 of the
Education Article is encouraged to include in the school’s social studies and history
curriculum at least a unit of instruction on the topics described in subsection (a) of this
section using or based on the content standards and curriculum standards adopted by the
State Board under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.